Nebraska, session 109, LB596.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 23-346.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-346.01 In It shall be the duty of the county clerk, in all counties
having a population of one hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants as
determined by the most recent federal decennial census, on or before December
1, annually, to prepare separate estimates of the supplies, materials,
equipment and machinery required for the use of the county officers during the
coming year, which by law are not required to be furnished by the state, and,
in order to properly estimate the amounts of supplies, materials, equipment and
machinery to be needed by the county government, the county clerk or the county
clerk's designee shall keep a perpetual inventory of all personal property of
the county.
Sec. 2. Section 23-1303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
23-1303 (1) The county clerk shall not issue any county warrants except
upon claims approved by the county board. Every warrant issued shall be
numbered consecutively as allowed from July 1 to June 30, corresponding with
the fiscal year of the county. The county clerk shall maintain records
including the date, amount, and number of each warrant, the name of the person
to whom a warrant is issued, and the date a warrant is returned as canceled.
The records shall be made accessible to the public for viewing, in either an
electronic or printed format.
(2)(a) The county clerk shall develop and implement a system of warrant
preparation and issuance by electronic or mechanical means which is compatible
with the funds transfer system established by the county treasurer pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section. The county clerk may combine warrants for
individual funds into a summary warrant that lists each fund and the amount
requested from such fund.
(b) Warrant includes an order issued by the chairperson of the county
board and countersigned by the county clerk directing that the county treasurer
make payment in a specified amount to a specified payee by the use of a dual
signature negotiable instrument as provided for in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section, an electronic funds transfer system, a telephonic funds transfer
system, funds transfers as provided in article 4A, Uniform Commercial Code, a
mechanical funds transfer system, or any other funds transfer system
established by the county treasurer.
(3) The chairperson of the county board shall sign each warrant or shall
cause each warrant to be signed in his or her behalf either personally, by
delegation of authority, or by facsimile or electronic signature. The signature
of the chairperson of the county board shall signify that the payment intended
by a warrant bearing such signature is proper under the appropriate laws of the
state and resolutions of the county.
(4) The county clerk shall countersign all warrants issued by the
chairperson of the county board either personally, by delegation of authority,
or by facsimile or electronic signature.
(5) The county treasurer shall, if requested by the county clerk or the
county board, establish procedures and processes for facsimile or electronic
signature of warrants.
(6) The county treasurer may establish and operate an electronic funds
transfer system, a telephonic funds transfer system, funds transfers as
provided for in article 4A, Uniform Commercial Code, a mechanical funds
transfer system, or any other funds transfer system for the payment of funds
from and the deposit of receipts into the county treasury. Such system as
established by the county treasurer shall employ internal control safeguards
-1-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
and after meeting such safeguards shall be deemed to satisfy any signature
requirements. The use of an electronic funds transfer system, a telephonic
funds transfer system, funds transfers as provided for in article 4A, Uniform
Commercial Code, a mechanical funds transfer system, or any other funds
transfer system established by the county treasurer shall not create any rights
that would not have been created had an order, drawn by the chairperson of the
county board upon the county treasurer directing the latter to pay a specified
amount to a specified payee by the use of a dual signature negotiable
instrument as provided for in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, been
used as the payment medium.
Sec. 3. Section 23-1309, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
23-1309 (1) It shall be the duty of the county clerk in each county to
keep in a separate book or books, entitled Discharge Record, a copy of all
discharges or records of separation from active duty from the armed forces of
the United States. Information contained in the Discharge Record shall be
confidential and made available only to the veteran, county veterans service
officer, or post service officer of a recognized veterans organization.
(2) The county clerk may transfer the Discharge Record to the State
Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society for permanent preservation
after the veteran's federal Official Military Personnel File becomes a public
archival record or after sixty-two years, whichever is later.
Sec. 4. Section 23-1517.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-1517.01 (1) The recording of all instruments by the roll form of
microfilm or other accessible durable medium may be substituted for the method
of recording instruments in books, and the filing of all documents by the roll
form of microfilm or other accessible durable medium may be substituted for the
method of filing original documents. If this method of recording instruments on
microfilm or filing documents on microfilm is used, the original instruments so
recorded and the original documents so filed need not be retained after the
microfilm or other accessible durable medium has been verified for accuracy and
quality, and a security copy shall on silver negative microfilm in roll form
must be maintained and filed off premises under safe conditions to insure the
protection of the records and shall meet the microfilm standards as prescribed
by the State Records Administrator as provided in sections 84-1201 to 84-1220.
The fee books shall provide the proper index information as to the microfilm
roll and numerical sequence of all such recorded instruments and of all such
filed documents. The internal reference copies or work copies of the
instruments recorded on microfilm and of documents filed on microfilm may be in
any photographic form to provide the necessary information as may be determined
by the official in charge.
(2) For purposes of this section, a medium is accessible if it is able to
be retrieved through intellectual, digital, or physical means within
institutional or legal parameters.
Sec. 5. Section 23-1527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
23-1527 A certified copy of a petition, with schedules omitted, commencing
a proceeding under the laws of the United States relating to bankruptcy or a
certified copy of the decree of adjudication or a certified copy of an order
approving the bond of the trustee appointed in such proceedings shall be filed,
indexed, and recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county in
which is located real property in which the bankrupt has an interest in the
same manner as federal liens are filed, indexed, and recorded pursuant to the
Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act. The filing fee for such recording shall
be the same as the fee for filing and recording as set forth in section 9-525,
Uniform Commercial Code. The register of deeds shall file the notices in a file
kept for such purpose and designated Notice of Bankruptcy Proceedings, except
that in offices filing by the roll form of microfilm or other accessible
durable medium pursuant to section 23-1517.01, the original notices need not be
retained.
Sec. 6. Section 25-523, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
25-523 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Digital newspaper means an Internet website that:
(i) Employs staff in the county from which the digital newspaper is
published online;
(ii) Has at least three hundred paid subscribers if located in a city of
the metropolitan class or city of the primary class;
(iii) Has at least two hundred paid subscribers if located in a city of
the first class, city of the second class, or village;
(iv) Publishes exclusively online;
(v) Has updated its news at least once each week for at least one year
prior to the publication of a notice; and
(vi) Reports on events and governmental activities of local interest; and
(b) E-edition means a digital facsimile of a newspaper's print edition
that is accessible from such newspaper's website and is substantially the same
in both format and content as the print edition of such newspaper.
(2)(a) No newspaper shall be considered a legal newspaper for the
publication of legal and other official notices unless the same shall have a
bona fide circulation of at least three hundred paid subscriptions if located
in a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary class or at least
two hundred paid subscriptions if located in a city of the first class, city of
-2-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
the second class, or village weekly, and shall have been published within the
county or an adjacent county for fifty-two successive weeks prior to the
publication of such notice, and then subsequently at least fifty times per
year. and be printed, either in whole or in part, in an office maintained at
the place of publication; Provided, that
(b) The e-edition of a legal newspaper shall be considered a legal
newspaper for the publication of legal and other official notices only if (i)
such notices are contemporaneously published in the print edition of such
newspaper or (ii) the newspaper (A) has ceased publication of its print edition
and (B) was considered a legal newspaper when it ceased publication.
(c) If no newspaper considered to be a legal newspaper publishes either a
print edition or an e-edition within a county, any legal and other official
notices directed to persons or entities in that county may be published in a
digital newspaper within the county if available at a rate not to exceed legal
notice rates pursuant to sections 33-141 to 33-143.
(3) Nothing nothing in this section shall invalidate the publication in a
newspaper which has suspended publication or been printed outside of the
county, on account of fire, flood, or other unavoidable accident, for not to
exceed ten weeks, in the year last preceding the first publication of a legal
notice, advertising, or publication. All ; provided further, that all
publications made prior to May 22, 1941, in a newspaper which has, on account
of flood, fire, or other unavoidable accident, suspended publication or been
printed in an office outside of the county, are hereby legalized ; provided
further, that all newspapers, otherwise complying herewith, which have, on
account of flood, fire or other unavoidable accident, suspended publication or
been printed in an office outside of the county, for not to exceed ten weeks in
any year, are hereby legalized; and provided further, that the publication of
legal or other official notices in the English language in foreign language
newspapers published within the county for fifty-two successive weeks prior to
the publication of such a notice, and printed either in whole or in part in an
office maintained at the place of publication, shall also be legal.
Sec. 7. Section 25-21,271, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
25-21,271 (1) Any person desiring to change his or her name shall file a
petition in the district court of the county in which such person may be a
resident, setting forth (a) that the petitioner has been a bona fide citizen of
such county for at least one year prior to the filing of the petition, (b) the
address of the petitioner, (c) the date of birth of the petitioner, (d) the
cause for which the change of petitioner's name is sought, and (e) the name
asked for.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, notice of
the filing of the petition shall be published in a newspaper in the county, and
if no newspaper is printed in the county, then in a newspaper of general
circulation therein. The notice shall be published (i) once a week for four
consecutive weeks if the petitioner is nineteen years of age or older at the
time the action is filed and (ii) once a week for two consecutive weeks if the
petitioner is under nineteen years of age at the time the action is filed.
(b) The court may waive the notice requirement of subdivision (2)(a) of
this section upon a showing by the petitioner that such notice would endanger
the petitioner.
(3) In an action involving a petitioner under nineteen years of age who
has a noncustodial parent, notice of the filing of the petition shall be sent
by certified mail within five days after publication to the noncustodial parent
at the address provided to the clerk of the district court pursuant to
subsection (1) of section 42-364.13 for the noncustodial parent if he or she
has provided an address. The clerk of the district court shall provide the
petitioner with the address upon request.
(4) It shall be the duty of the district court, upon being duly satisfied
by proof in open court of the truth of the allegations set forth in the
petition, that there exists proper and reasonable cause for changing the name
of the petitioner, and that notice of the filing of the petition has been given
as required by this section, to order and direct a change of name of such
petitioner and that an order for the purpose be entered by the court.
(5) The clerk of the district court shall deliver a copy of any name-
change order issued by the court pursuant to this section to the Department of
Health and Human Services for use pursuant to sections 28-376 and 28-718 and to
the sex offender registration and community notification division of the
Nebraska State Patrol for use pursuant to section 29-4004.
Sec. 8. Section 25-2228, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
25-2228 (1) All legal publications and notices of whatever kind or
character that may by law be required to be published a certain number of days
or a certain number of weeks shall be legally published when they have been
published in a print edition of one issue in each week in a daily, weekly,
semiweekly, or triweekly newspaper, or in an e-edition or digital newspaper as
provided in section 25-523 such publication in such daily, semiweekly, or
triweekly paper or papers to be made upon any one day of the week upon which
such paper is published. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
preventing the publication of such legal notices and publications in weekly
newspapers. Any newspaper publishing such legal notices or publications as
provided in this section must shall be otherwise qualified under section 25-523
existing law to publish such notices or publications. All legal publications
and all notices of whatever kind or character that may be required by law to be
-3-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
published a certain number of days or a certain number of weeks, shall be and
hereby are declared to be legally published when they shall have been published
once a week in a weekly, semiweekly, triweekly, or daily newspaper for the
number of weeks, covering the period of publication. For the purpose of this
section, when a newspaper is published regularly four or more times each week,
it shall be deemed a daily newspaper.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2022, all legal publications and notices of
whatever kind or character that may by law be required to be published a
certain number of days or a certain number of weeks shall also be posted by the
newspaper or digital newspaper publishing such legal publications or notices on
a statewide website established and maintained as a repository for such notices
by a majority of Nebraska newspapers. A website posting or a failure to make
such website posting under this subsection shall not affect the validity of the
publication or notice published under subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 9. Section 33-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
33-110 County clerks shall receive no fee for the performance of the
following services: For issuing certificates of election; for performing the
duties of clerk of the county board; for taking acknowledgments of claims
against the county; for attesting or certifying any document authorized by the
county board or required by the departments of the state; or for recording Army
or Navy discharges or furnishing certified copies thereof to be used in
connection with any claim for compensation or disability. A charge of twenty-
five cents shall be made for any other certificate and seal unless otherwise
provided. The fees collected shall be credited to the county general fund.
County clerks shall receive a fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for the
entire proceedings of issuing a marriage license, administering the related
oaths or affirmations, and recording a marriage certificate. An additional fee
of sixteen nine dollars shall be made for each certified copy of a marriage
record on file in the office of the county clerk. Both such fees shall be
deposited in the county general fund.
Sec. 10. Section 33-141, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
33-141 (1) Until one year after September 9, 1995, the legal rate for the
publication of all legal notices other than those exceptional legal notices
described in section 33-142 shall be forty-one cents per line, single column,
standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven
for the first insertion and thirty-five and nine-tenths cents per line, single
column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of
eleven for each subsequent insertion. Publication of such notices may be in any
type selected by the publisher. For the purpose of uniformity, the calculation
of fees for such publication shall be based on the official conversion table
that follows:
CONVERSION TABLE
Five-and-One-Half-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 48.791 ¢ 42.721 ¢
9 1/2 51.502 45.095
10 54.213 47.469
10 1/2 56.924 49.843
11 59.635 52.217
11 1/2 62.346 54.591
12 65.057 56.965
12 1/2 67.768 59.339
13 70.479 61.713
13 1/2 73.190 64.087
14 75.901 66.461
14 1/2 78.612 68.835
15 81.323 71.209
15 1/2 84.034 73.583
16 86.745 75.957
Six-Point Type
-4-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 44.725 ¢ 39.161 ¢
9 1/2 47.210 41.337
10 49.695 43.513
10 1/2 52.180 45.689
11 54.665 47.865
11 1/2 57.150 50.041
12 59.635 52.217
12 1/2 62.120 54.393
13 64.605 56.569
13 1/2 67.090 58.745
14 69.575 60.921
14 1/2 72.060 63.097
15 74.545 65.273
15 1/2 77.030 67.449
16 79.515 69.625
Seven-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 38.339 ¢ 33.570 ¢
9 1/2 40.469 35.435
10 42.599 37.300
10 1/2 44.729 39.165
11 46.859 41.030
11 1/2 48.989 42.895
12 51.119 44.760
12 1/2 53.249 46.625
13 55.379 48.490
13 1/2 57.509 50.355
14 59.639 52.220
14 1/2 61.769 54.085
15 63.899 55.950
15 1/2 66.029 57.815
16 68.159 59.680
Eight-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 33.544 ¢ 29.372 ¢
9 1/2 35.408 31.004
10 37.272 32.636
10 1/2 39.136 34.268
-5-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
11 41.000 35.900
11 1/2 42.864 37.532
12 44.728 39.164
12 1/2 46.592 40.796
13 48.456 42.428
13 1/2 50.320 44.060
14 52.184 45.692
14 1/2 54.048 47.324
15 55.912 48.956
15 1/2 57.776 50.588
16 59.640 52.220
Nine-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 29.817 ¢ 26.108 ¢
9 1/2 31.474 27.559
10 33.131 29.010
10 1/2 34.788 30.461
11 36.445 31.912
11 1/2 38.102 33.363
12 39.759 34.814
12 1/2 41.416 36.265
13 43.073 37.716
13 1/2 44.730 39.167
14 46.387 40.618
14 1/2 48.044 42.069
15 49.701 43.520
15 1/2 51.358 44.971
16 53.015 46.422
Ten-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 26.836 ¢ 23.496 ¢
9 1/2 28.327 24.802
10 29.818 26.108
10 1/2 31.309 27.414
11 32.800 28.720
11 1/2 34.291 30.026
12 35.782 31.332
12 1/2 37.273 32.638
13 38.764 33.944
-6-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
13 1/2 40.255 35.250
14 41.746 36.556
14 1/2 43.237 37.862
15 44.728 39.168
15 1/2 46.219 40.474
16 47.710 41.780.
(2) Until October 1, 2022, the legal rate for the publication of all legal
notices other than those exceptional legal notices described in section 33-142
shall be forty-five cents per line, single column, standard newspaper
measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for the first
insertion and thirty-nine and four-tenths cents per line, single column,
standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven
for each subsequent insertion. Publication of such notices may be in any type
selected by the publisher. For the purpose of uniformity, the calculation of
fees for such publication shall be based on the official conversion table that
follows:
CONVERSION TABLE
Five-and-One-Half-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 53.553 ¢ 46.887 ¢
9 1/2 56.528 49.492
10 59.503 52.097
10 1/2 62.478 54.702
11 65.453 57.307
11 1/2 68.428 59.912
12 71.403 62.517
12 1/2 74.378 65.122
13 77.353 67.727
13 1/2 80.328 70.332
14 83.303 72.937
14 1/2 86.278 75.542
15 89.253 78.147
15 1/2 92.228 80.752
16 95.203 83.357
Six-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 49.087 ¢ 42.980 ¢
9 1/2 51.815 45.368
10 54.543 47.756
10 1/2 57.271 50.144
11 59.999 52.532
11 1/2 62.727 54.920
12 65.455 57.308
12 1/2 68.183 59.696
-7-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
13 70.911 62.084
13 1/2 73.639 64.472
14 76.367 66.860
14 1/2 79.095 69.248
15 81.823 71.636
15 1/2 84.551 74.024
16 87.279 76.412
Seven-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 42.079 ¢ 36.842 ¢
9 1/2 44.417 38.889
10 46.755 40.936
10 1/2 49.093 42.983
11 51.431 45.030
11 1/2 53.769 47.077
12 56.107 49.124
12 1/2 58.445 51.171
13 60.783 53.218
13 1/2 63.121 55.265
14 65.459 57.312
14 1/2 67.797 59.359
15 70.135 61.406
15 1/2 72.473 63.453
16 74.811 65.500
Eight-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 36.816 ¢ 32.236 ¢
9 1/2 38.862 34.027
10 40.908 35.818
10 1/2 42.954 37.609
11 45.000 39.400
11 1/2 47.046 41.191
12 49.092 42.982
12 1/2 51.138 44.773
13 53.184 46.564
13 1/2 55.230 48.355
14 57.276 50.146
14 1/2 59.322 51.937
15 61.368 53.728
-8-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
15 1/2 63.414 55.519
16 65.460 57.310
Nine-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 32.724 ¢ 28.655 ¢
9 1/2 34.543 30.247
10 36.362 31.839
10 1/2 38.181 33.431
11 40.000 35.023
11 1/2 41.819 36.615
12 43.638 38.207
12 1/2 45.457 39.799
13 47.276 41.391
13 1/2 49.095 42.983
14 50.914 44.575
14 1/2 52.733 46.167
15 54.552 47.759
15 1/2 56.371 49.351
16 58.190 50.943
Ten-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 29.452 ¢ 25.788 ¢
9 1/2 31.089 27.221
10 32.726 28.654
10 1/2 34.363 30.087
11 36.000 31.520
11 1/2 37.637 32.953
12 39.274 34.386
12 1/2 40.911 35.819
13 42.548 37.252
13 1/2 44.185 38.685
14 45.822 40.118
14 1/2 47.459 41.551
15 49.096 42.984
15 1/2 50.733 44.417
16 52.370 45.850.
(3) Beginning October 1, 2022, and until October 1, 2023, the legal rate
for the publication of all legal notices other than those exceptional legal
notices described in section 33-142 shall be forty-eight cents per line, single
column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of
eleven for the first insertion and thirty-nine and four-tenths cents per line,
single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica
width of eleven for each subsequent insertion. Publication of such notices may
-9-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
be in any type selected by the publisher. For the purpose of uniformity, the
calculation of fees for such publication shall be based on the official
conversion table that follows:
CONVERSION TABLE
Five-and-One-Half-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 57.102 ¢ 49.700 ¢
9 1/2 60.296 52.462
10 63.469 55.223
10 1/2 66.643 57.984
11 69.816 60.745
11 1/2 72.989 63.507
12 76.163 66.268
12 1/2 79.336 69.029
13 82.509 71.791
13 1/2 85.683 74.552
14 88.856 77.313
14 1/2 92.029 80.075
15 95.203 82.836
15 1/2 98.376 85.597
16 101.549 88.358
Six-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 52.359 ¢ 45.559 ¢
9 1/2 55.269 48.090
10 58.179 50.621
10 1/2 61.089 53.153
11 63.999 55.684
11 1/2 66.908 58.215
12 69.818 60.746
12 1/2 72.728 63.278
13 75.638 65.809
13 1/2 78.548 68.340
14 81.458 94.192
14 1/2 84.367 73.403
15 87.277 75.934
15 1/2 90.187 78.465
16 93.097 80.997
Seven-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 44.884 ¢ 39.053 ¢
-10-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
9 1/2 47.378 41.222
10 49.872 43.392
10 1/2 52.366 45.562
11 54.859 47.732
11 1/2 57.353 49.902
12 59.847 52.071
12 1/2 62.341 54.241
13 64.835 56.411
13 1/2 67.329 58.581
14 69.819 60.751
14 1/2 72.316 62.921
15 74.810 65.090
15 1/2 77.304 67.260
16 79.798 69.430
Eight-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 39.270 ¢ 34.170 ¢
9 1/2 41.453 36.069
10 43.635 37.967
10 1/2 45.817 39.866
11 48.000 41.764
11 1/2 50.182 43.662
12 52.364 45.561
12 1/2 54.547 47.459
13 56.729 49.358
13 1/2 58.912 51.256
14 61.094 53.155
14 1/2 63.276 55.053
15 65.459 56.952
15 1/2 67.641 58.850
16 69.824 60.749
Nine-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 34.905 ¢ 30.374 ¢
9 1/2 36.846 32.062
10 38.786 33.749
10 1/2 40.726 35.437
11 42.666 37.124
11 1/2 44.607 38.812
-11-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
12 46.547 40.499
12 1/2 48.487 42.187
13 50.427 43.874
13 1/2 52.368 45.562
14 54.308 47.250
14 1/2 56.248 48.937
15 58.188 50.625
15 1/2 60.129 52.312
16 62.069 54.000
Ten-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 31.415 ¢ 27.335 ¢
9 1/2 33.161 28.854
10 34.908 30.373
10 1/2 36.654 31.892
11 38.400 33.411
11 1/2 40.146 34.930
12 41.892 36.449
12 1/2 43.638 37.968
13 45.384 39.487
13 1/2 47.130 41.006
14 48.876 42.525
14 1/2 50.623 44.044
15 52.369 45.563
15 1/2 54.115 47.082
16 55.861 48.601.
(4) Beginning October 1, 2023, the legal rate for the publication of all
legal notices other than those exceptional legal notices described in section
33-142 shall be fifty cents per line, single column, standard newspaper
measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for the first
insertion and forty-three and thirty-four hundredths thirty-nine and four-
tenths cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-
point type and pica width of eleven for each subsequent insertion. Publication
of such notices may be in any type selected by the publisher. For the purpose
of uniformity, the calculation of fees for such publication shall be based on
the official conversion table that follows:
CONVERSION TABLE
Five-and-One-Half-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 59.481 ¢ 51.576 ¢
9 1/2 62.808 54.441
10 66.114 57.307
10 1/2 69.419 60.172
11 72.725 63.038
-12-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
11 1/2 76.030 65.903
12 79.336 68.769
12 1/2 82.641 71.634
13 85.947 74.500
13 1/2 89.552 77.365
14 92.558 80.231
14 1/2 95.863 83.096
15 99.169 85.962
15 1/2 102.475 88.827
16 105.780 91.693
Six-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 54.541 ¢ 47.278 ¢
9 1/2 57.572 49.905
10 60.603 52.532
10 1/2 63.634 55.158
11 66.665 57.785
11 1/2 69.696 60.412
12 72.727 63.039
12 1/2 75.758 65.666
13 78.789 68.292
13 1/2 81.820 70.919
14 84.851 97.746
14 1/2 87.882 76.173
15 90.914 78.800
15 1/2 93.945 81.426
16 96.976 84.053
Seven-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 46.754 ¢ 40.526 ¢
9 1/2 49.352 42.778
10 51.949 45.030
10 1/2 54.547 47.281
11 57.145 49.533
11 1/2 59.743 51.785
12 62.340 54.036
12 1/2 64.938 56.288
13 67.536 58.540
13 1/2 70.134 60.792
-13-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
14 72.728 63.043
14 1/2 75.329 65.295
15 77.927 67.547
15 1/2 80.525 69.798
16 83.123 72.050
Eight-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 40.906 ¢ 35.460 ¢
9 1/2 43.180 37.430
10 45.453 39.400
10 1/2 47.726 41.370
11 50.000 43.340
11 1/2 52.273 45.310
12 54.546 47.280
12 1/2 56.819 49.250
13 59.093 51.220
13 1/2 61.366 53.191
14 63.639 55.161
14 1/2 65.913 57.131
15 68.186 59.101
15 1/2 70.459 61.071
16 72.733 63.041
Nine-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 36.360 ¢ 31.521 ¢
9 1/2 38.381 33.272
10 40.402 35.023
10 1/2 42.423 36.774
11 44.444 38.525
11 1/2 46.465 40.277
12 48.486 42.028
12 1/2 50.507 43.779
13 52.528 45.530
13 1/2 54.549 47.281
14 56.571 49.033
14 1/2 58.592 50.784
15 60.613 52.535
15 1/2 62.634 54.286
16 64.655 56.037
-14-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
Ten-Point Type
Pica Width First Insertion Subsequent Insertions
9 32.721 ¢ 28.367 ¢
9 1/2 34.540 29.943
10 36.359 31.519
10 1/2 38.177 33.096
11 39.996 34.672
11 1/2 41.815 36.248
12 43.633 37.825
12 1/2 45.452 39.401
13 47.271 40.977
13 1/2 49.090 42.554
14 50.908 44.130
14 1/2 52.727 45.706
15 54.546 47.282
15 1/2 56.364 48.859
16 58.183 50.453.
Sec. 11. Section 69-1311, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
69-1311 (a) The State Treasurer shall annually cause notice to be
published once in each an English language legal newspaper of general
circulation in each county in this state in which is located the last-known
address of any person to be named in the notice. If no address is known, then
the notice shall be published in a legal newspaper having statewide
circulation.
(b) The published notice shall be entitled Notice to Owners of Abandoned
Property and shall contain:
(1)(i) (1) The names in alphabetical order and counties of last-known
addresses, if any, of persons listed in the report and entitled to notice or
(ii) a display ad that covers at least twenty-five percent of a standard
broadsheet and includes a description of how to search for unclaimed property
as provided in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A statement that information concerning the amount or description of
the property and the name and address of the holder may be obtained by any
person possessing an interest in the property by addressing an inquiry to the
State Treasurer.
(c) The State Treasurer is not required to publish in such notice any item
of less than fifty dollars unless the State Treasurer he or she deems such
publication to be in the public interest.
(d) Within one hundred twenty days from the receipt of the report required
by section 69-1310, the State Treasurer shall mail a notice to each person
having an address listed therein who appears to be entitled to property of the
value of fifty dollars or more presumed abandoned under the Uniform Disposition
of Unclaimed Property Act.
(e) The mailed notice shall contain:
(1) A statement that, according to a report filed with the State
Treasurer, property is being held to which the addressee appears entitled.
(2) The name and address of the person holding the property and any
necessary information regarding changes of name and address of the holder.
(3) A statement that, if satisfactory proof of claim is presented by the
owner to the State Treasurer, arrangements will be made to transfer the
property to the owner as provided by law.
(f) This section is not applicable to sums payable on traveler's checks or
money orders presumed abandoned under section 69-1302.
Sec. 12. Section 72-728, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
72-728 (1) This subsection shall not apply to subsections (2) and (3) of
this section. The Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission shall not name more than one person to the
Nebraska Hall of Fame during each five-year period beginning on and after
January 1, 2005. During the first two years of each five-year period, the
commission shall receive nominations of candidates to be named to the Nebraska
Hall of Fame. The commission shall review the nominations and may select the
finalists for induction. During the subsequent two years of each five-year
-15-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
period, the commission shall review the finalists, if any, and shall hold
public hearings regarding the finalists in each of the congressional districts.
After the hearings, the commission may select one finalist for induction. If a
finalist is selected for induction, the commission shall name him or her to the
Nebraska Hall of Fame during the final year of each five-year period. No
individual shall be named to the Nebraska Hall of Fame until at least thirty-
five years after such person's demise.
(2) The Notwithstanding the limitations imposed by subsection (1) of this
section, the commission shall procure an appropriate plaque upon which shall be
placed the names of each Nebraskan awarded the Medal of Honor as a result of
such person's services in the armed forces of the United States. Such plaque
shall have sufficient space for listing the names of persons who shall be
awarded the Medal of Honor in the future. The plaque shall have a suitable
place in the State Capitol.
(3) Prior to June 30, 2027, the commission shall name one living person to
the Nebraska Hall of Fame. Such person shall be a Nebraskan as defined in
section 72-726 and have demonstrated a record of achievement in the following
areas:
(a) Public service;
(b) Leadership in collegiate athletics; and
(c) Volunteer youth mentorship activities.
Sec. 13. Section 77-3903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3903 (1)(a) A notice of lien provided for in the Uniform State Tax Lien
Registration and Enforcement Act upon real property shall be presented in the
office of the Secretary of State. Such notice of lien shall be transmitted by
the Secretary of State to and filed in the office of the register of deeds by
the register of deeds of the county or counties in which the real property
subject to the lien is situated as designated in the notice of lien. The
register of deeds shall enter the notice in the alphabetical state tax lien
index, showing on one line the name and residence of the person liable named in
such notice, the last four digits of the social security number or the federal
tax identification number of such person, the Tax Commissioner's or
Commissioner of Labor's serial number of such notice, the date and hour of
filing, and the amount due. Such presentments to the Secretary of State may be
made by direct input to the Secretary of State's database or by other
electronic means. All such notices of lien shall be retained in numerical order
in a file designated state tax lien notices, except that in offices filing by
the roll form of microfilm or other accessible durable medium pursuant to
section 23-1517.01, the original notices need not be retained. A lien subject
to this subsection shall be effective upon real property when filed by the
register of deeds as provided in this subsection.
(b) A notice of lien provided for in the Uniform State Tax Lien
Registration and Enforcement Act upon personal property shall be filed in the
office of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall enter the notice
in the state's central tax lien index, showing on one line the name and
residence of the person liable named in such notice, the last four digits of
the social security number or the federal tax identification number of such
person, the Tax Commissioner's or Commissioner of Labor's serial number of such
notice, the date and hour of filing, and the amount due. Such filings with the
Secretary of State may be filed by direct input to the Secretary of State's
database or by other electronic means. All such notices of lien shall be
retained in numerical order in a file designated state tax lien notices.
(2) The uniform fee, payable to the Secretary of State, for presenting for
filing, releasing, continuing, or subordinating or for filing, releasing,
continuing, or subordinating each tax lien pursuant to the Uniform State Tax
Lien Registration and Enforcement Act shall be two times the fee required for
recording instruments with the register of deeds as provided in section 33-109.
There shall be no fee for the filing of a termination statement. The uniform
fee for each county more than one designated pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of
this section shall be the fee required for recording instruments with the
register of deeds as provided in section 33-109. The Secretary of State shall
remit each fee received pursuant to this subsection to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund, except that of the fees received
pursuant to this subsection, the Secretary of State shall remit the fee
required for recording instruments with the register of deeds as provided in
section 33-109 to the register of deeds of a county for each designation of
such county in a filing pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section.
(3) The Secretary of State shall bill the Tax Commissioner or Commissioner
of Labor on a monthly basis for fees for documents presented to or filed with
the Secretary of State. No payment of any fee shall be required at the time of
presenting or filing any such lien document.
Sec. 14. Section 84-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1208 (1) The administrator may make or cause to be made preservation
duplicates of essential records or may designate as preservation duplicates
existing copies thereof. A preservation duplicate shall be durable, accurate,
complete, and clear and, if made by means of photography, microphotography,
photocopying, film, microfilm, optical imagery, or similar processes using an
accessible durable medium, shall be prepared in conformity to standards
prescribed and approved by the board.
(2) A preservation duplicate made by a photographic, photostatic,
microfilm, microcard, miniature photographic, optical imagery, or similar
-16-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
process which accurately reproduces or forms an accessible a durable medium for
so reproducing the original shall have the same force and effect for all
purposes as the original record, whether the original is in existence or not. A
transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of such preservation duplicate
shall for all purposes be deemed a transcript, exemplification, or certified
copy of the original record.
(3) No copy of an essential record shall be used as a preservation
duplicate unless, under the general laws of the state, the copy has the same
force and effect for all purposes as the original record.
(4) A medium is accessible if it is able to be retrieved through
intellectual, digital, or physical means within institutional or legal
parameters.
Sec. 15. Section 84-1411, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
84-1411 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, each
public body shall give reasonable advance publicized notice of the time and
place of each meeting by a method designated by each public body and recorded
in its minutes as provided in this subsection. Such notice shall be transmitted
to all members of the public body and to the public.
(b)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this section, in
the case of a public body described in subdivision (1)(a)(i) of section 84-1409
or such body's advisory committees, such notice shall be given at least four
times each year of the regular meeting schedule, the location, and the method
designated by the public body to provide reasonable advance publicized notice.
Such notice shall be given by publication in a legal newspaper of general
circulation within the public body's jurisdiction. by:
(ii) Subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section shall not apply in the case of
the governing body of a city of the second class or village, any advisory
committee of such governing body, the governing body of a rural or suburban
fire protection district, or any public body that only meets intermittently and
is not required to hold regular meetings.
(iii) Failure to comply with subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section shall
not cause any motion, resolution, rule, regulation, ordinance, or formal action
of a public body made or taken at a meeting of the public body to be void or
voidable.
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the public
body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website, if available, and
(III) posting on a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers. Such
notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the websites by the newspaper;
or
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II) posting
to a statewide website, if available, established and maintained as a
repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if no edition
of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's jurisdiction is
to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date of the meeting. Such
notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the websites by the newspaper.
(ii) In the case of the governing body of a city of the second class or
village, any advisory committee of such governing body, or the governing body
of a rural or suburban fire protection district, such notice shall be given by:
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the public
body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website, if available, and
(III) posting on a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers. Such
notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the websites by the newspaper;
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II) posting
on a statewide website, if available, established and maintained as a
repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if no edition
of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's jurisdiction is
to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date of the meeting. Such
notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the websites by the newspaper;
or
(C) Posting written notice in three conspicuous public places in such
city, village, or district. Such notice shall be posted by the public body in
the same three places for each meeting.
(iii) In the case of a public body not described in subdivision (1)(b)(i)
or (ii) of this section, such notice shall be given by a method designated by
the public body.
(c) For a public body that decides to publish notice in a newspaper of
general circulation within the public body's jurisdiction to meet the notice
requirement in subdivision (1)(a) of this section, in (iv) In case of refusal,
neglect, or inability of the newspaper to publish the notice, the public body
shall (i) (A) post such notice on its website, if available, (ii) (B) request
the newspaper submit a post on a statewide website, if available, established
and maintained as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska
newspapers, and (iii) (C) post such notice in a conspicuous public place in
such public body's jurisdiction. The public body shall keep a written record of
such posting pursuant to subdivision (1)(c)(i) (1)(b)(iv)(A) and (iii) (C) of
this section and a written record of the request to the newspaper pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c)(ii) (1)(b)(iv)(B) of this section. The record of such
posting shall be evidence that such posting was done as required and shall be
-17-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
sufficient to fulfill the requirement of publication.
(c) In addition to a method of notice required by subdivision (1)(b)(i) or
(ii) of this section, such notice may also be provided by any other appropriate
method designated by such public body or such advisory committee.
(d) Each public body shall record the methods and dates of such notice in
its minutes.
(e) Such notice shall contain an agenda of subjects known at the time of
the publicized notice or a statement that the agenda, which shall be kept
continually current, shall be readily available for public inspection at the
principal office of the public body during normal business hours. Agenda items
shall be sufficiently descriptive to give the public reasonable notice of the
matters to be considered at the meeting. Except for items of an emergency
nature, the agenda shall not be altered later than (i) twenty-four hours before
the scheduled commencement of the meeting or (ii) forty-eight hours before the
scheduled commencement of a meeting of a city council or village board
scheduled outside the corporate limits of the municipality. The public body
shall have the right to modify the agenda to include items of an emergency
nature only at such public meeting.
(2)(a) The following entities may hold a meeting by means of virtual
conferencing if the requirements of subdivision (2)(b) of this section are met:
(i) A state agency, state board, state commission, state council, or state
committee, or an advisory committee of any such state entity;
(ii) An organization, including the governing body, created under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Joint Public Agency Act, or the Municipal
Cooperative Financing Act;
(iii) The governing body of a public power district having a chartered
territory of more than one county in this state;
(iv) The governing body of a public power and irrigation district having a
chartered territory of more than one county in this state;
(v) An educational service unit;
(vi) The Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council;
(vii) An organization, including the governing body, of a risk management
pool or its advisory committees organized in accordance with the
Intergovernmental Risk Management Act;
(viii) A community college board of governors;
(ix) The Nebraska Brand Committee;
(x) A local public health department;
(xi) A metropolitan utilities district;
(xii) A regional metropolitan transit authority; and
(xiii) A natural resources district.
(b) The requirements for holding a meeting by means of virtual
conferencing are as follows:
(i) Reasonable advance publicized notice is given as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, including providing access to a dial-in number
or link to the virtual conference;
(ii) In addition to the public's right to participate by virtual
conferencing, reasonable arrangements are made to accommodate the public's
right to attend at a physical site and participate as provided in section
84-1412, including reasonable seating, in at least one designated site in a
building open to the public and identified in the notice, with: At least one
member of the entity holding such meeting, or his or her designee, present at
each site; a recording of the hearing by audio or visual recording devices; and
a reasonable opportunity for input, such as public comment or questions, is
provided to at least the same extent as would be provided if virtual
conferencing was not used;
(iii) At least one copy of all documents being considered at the meeting
is available at any physical site open to the public where individuals may
attend the virtual conference. The public body shall also provide links to an
electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being considered at the meeting,
and the current version of the Open Meetings Act; and
(iv) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, subsection (1) of
section 70-1014, subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02, or subsection (4) of
section 79-2204, no more than one-half of the meetings of the state entities,
advisory committees, boards, councils, organizations, or governing bodies are
held by virtual conferencing in a calendar year. In the case of (A) an
organization created under the Interlocal Cooperation Act that sells
electricity or natural gas, (B) an organization created under the Municipal
Cooperative Financing Act, (C) a governing body of a risk management pool and
any advisory committee of such governing body, or (D) any advisory committee of
any state entity created in response to the Opioid Prevention and Treatment
Act, (E) the Semiquincentennial Commission, (F) the board of trustees of the
Nebraska State Historical Society, or (G) any local foster care review board,
such organization, governing body, or committee may hold more than one-half of
its meetings by virtual conferencing if such organization holds at least one
meeting each calendar year that is not by virtual conferencing.
(3) Virtual conferencing, emails, faxes, or other electronic communication
shall not be used to circumvent any of the public government purposes
established in the Open Meetings Act.
(4) The secretary or other designee of each public body shall maintain a
list of the news media requesting notification of meetings and shall make
reasonable efforts to provide advance notification to them of the time and
place of each meeting and the subjects to be discussed at that meeting.
(5) When it is necessary to hold an emergency meeting without reasonable
-18-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
advance public notice, the nature of the emergency shall be stated in the
minutes and any formal action taken in such meeting shall pertain only to the
emergency. Such emergency meetings may be held by virtual conferencing. The
provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall be complied with in
conducting emergency meetings. Complete minutes of such emergency meetings
specifying the nature of the emergency and any formal action taken at the
meeting shall be made available to the public by no later than the end of the
next regular business day.
(6) A public body may allow a member of the public or any other witness to
appear before the public body by means of virtual conferencing.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (5) of this section, if an
emergency is declared by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency Management Act
as defined in section 81-829.39, a public body the territorial jurisdiction of
which is included in the emergency declaration, in whole or in part, may hold a
meeting by virtual conferencing during such emergency if the public body gives
reasonable advance publicized notice as described in subsection (1) of this
section. The notice shall include information regarding access for the public
and news media. In addition to any formal action taken pertaining to the
emergency, the public body may hold such meeting for the purpose of briefing,
discussion of public business, formation of tentative policy, or the taking of
any action by the public body.
(b) The public body shall provide access by providing a dial-in number or
a link to the virtual conference. The public body shall also provide links to
an electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being considered at the
meeting, and the current version of the Open Meetings Act. Reasonable
arrangements shall be made to accommodate the public's right to hear and speak
at the meeting and record the meeting. Subsection (4) of this section shall be
complied with in conducting such meetings.
(c) The nature of the emergency shall be stated in the minutes. Complete
minutes of such meeting specifying the nature of the emergency and any formal
action taken at the meeting shall be made available for inspection as provided
in subsection (5) of section 84-1413.
(8) In addition to any other statutory authorization for virtual
conferencing, any public body not listed in subdivision (2)(a) of this section
may hold a meeting by virtual conferencing if:
(a) The purpose of the virtual meeting is to discuss items that are
scheduled to be discussed or acted upon at a subsequent non-virtual open
meeting of the public body;
(b) No action is taken by the public body at the virtual meeting; and
(c) The public body complies with subdivisions (2)(b)(i) and (ii) of this
section.
(9) This section does not apply to a meeting of the Nebraska Power Review
Board or a public power district, a public power and irrigation district, an
electric membership association, an electric cooperative company, a
municipality having a generation and distribution system, or a registered group
of municipalities if such meeting is subject to section 70-1034.
Sec. 16. Section 84-1412, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1412 (1) Subject to the Open Meetings Act, the public has the right to
attend and the right to speak at meetings of public bodies, and all or any part
of a meeting of a public body, except for closed sessions called pursuant to
section 84-1410, may be videotaped, televised, photographed, broadcast, or
recorded by any person in attendance by means of a tape recorder, a camera,
video equipment, or any other means of pictorial or sonic reproduction or in
writing. Except for closed sessions called pursuant to section 84-1410, a
public body shall allow members of the public an opportunity to speak at each
meeting.
(2) It shall not be a violation of subsection (1) of this section for any
public body to make and enforce reasonable rules and regulations regarding the
conduct of persons attending, speaking at, videotaping, televising,
photographing, broadcasting, or recording its meetings, including meetings held
by virtual conferencing.
(3) No public body shall require members of the public to identify
themselves as a condition for admission to the meeting nor shall such body
require that the name of any member of the public be placed on the agenda prior
to such meeting in order to speak about items on the agenda. The body shall
require any member of the public desiring to address the body to identify
himself or herself, including an address and the name of any organization
represented by such person unless the address requirement is waived to protect
the security of the individual.
(4) No public body shall, for the purpose of circumventing the Open
Meetings Act, hold a meeting in a place known by the body to be too small to
accommodate the anticipated audience.
(5) No public body shall be deemed in violation of this section if it
holds its meeting in its traditional meeting place which is located in this
state.
(6) No public body shall be deemed in violation of this section if it
holds a meeting outside of this state if, but only if:
(a) A member entity of the public body is located outside of this state
and the meeting is in that member's jurisdiction;
(b) All out-of-state locations identified in the notice are located within
public buildings used by members of the entity or at a place which will
accommodate the anticipated audience;
-19-

LB596 LB596
2026 2026
(c) Reasonable arrangements are made to accommodate the public's right to
attend, hear, and speak at the meeting, including making virtual conferencing
available at an instate location to members, the public, or the press, if
requested twenty-four hours in advance;
(d) No more than twenty-five percent of the public body's meetings in a
calendar year are held out-of-state;
(e) Out-of-state meetings are not used to circumvent any of the public
government purposes established in the Open Meetings Act; and
(f) The public body publishes notice of the out-of-state meeting at least
twenty-one days before the date of the meeting in a legal newspaper of
statewide circulation.
(7) Each public body shall, upon request, make a reasonable effort to
accommodate the public's right to hear the discussion and testimony presented
at a meeting.
(8) Public bodies shall make available at the meeting or the instate
location for virtual conferencing as required by subdivision (6)(c) of this
section, for examination and copying by members of the public, at least one
copy of all reproducible written material to be discussed at an open meeting,
either in paper or electronic form. Public bodies shall make available at least
one current copy of the Open Meetings Act posted in the meeting room at a
location accessible to members of the public. At the beginning of the meeting,
the public shall be informed about the location of the posted information.
Sec. 17. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect the
validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 18. Original sections 23-346.01, 23-1303, 23-1309, 23-1517.01,
23-1527, 25-523, 33-110, 72-728, 72-728, 84-1208, and 84-1412, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, sections 25-21,271, 25-2228, 33-141, and 77-3903, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 69-1311 and 84-1411, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 19. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 19-1104
and 23-1313, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-20-